District of Columbia statutes.
9-1109.05

Amendments to agreement.

The Mayor may execute, on behalf of the District of Columbia, amendments to the agreement authorized by § 9-1109.02 so long as the agreement, as amended, continues to contain provisions that substantially satisfy the requirements in § 9-1109.04.

Sept. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-20, § 6, 44 DCR 4023
1981 Ed., § 1-2445.5.